Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-3305
On-demand driverless-capable vehicle network; authorized.

(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a person may operate an on-demand driverless-capable vehicle network. Such a network may provide transportation of persons or goods, including:

(a) For-hire transportation, including transportation for multiple passengers who agree to share the ride in whole or in part; and

(b) Public transportation.

(2) An on-demand driverless-capable vehicle network may connect passengers to driverless-capable vehicles either (a) exclusively or (b) as part of a digital network that also connects passengers to human drivers who provide transportation services, consistent with applicable law, in vehicles that are not driverless-capable vehicles.

Laws 2018, LB989, § 5.